Georgia, session 2025_26, SB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use taxes, is amended by revising subparagraph (A) of paragraph (75) as follows:
"(75)(A) The sale of eligible property. The exemption provided by this paragraph
applies only to sales occurring during the period commencing at 12:01 A.M. on July 30,
2016, August 7 and concluding at 12:00 Midnight on July 31, 2016 August 13 of each
year."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 115
- 1 -